Alaska, session 34, HB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 11.56.767(d) is amended to read: 04 (d) Failure to report a violent crime committed against an adult is a class B 05 misdemeanor [VIOLATION]. 06 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 APPLICABILITY. AS 11.56.767(d), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to 09 offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.